Hawaii statutes.
§516-45 General obligation bonds. The
director of finance may, from time to time, issue general obligation bonds in
such amounts as may be authorized by the legislature, for the purpose of
acquisition by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation of
residential houselots within development tracts pursuant to chapter 516, part
II or for the acquisition of suitable properties to exchange pursuant to
section 516-24.5 or for the acquisition by the department of land and natural
resources under section 171-50.1 of suitable properties for exchange pursuant
to section 171-50.2 to effectuate the purpose of this chapter. Pending the
receipt of funds from the issuance and sale of general obligation bonds,
amounts required within the limits of legislative authorization may be advanced
to the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation from the general fund
of the State. Upon the receipt of the bond funds, the general fund shall be
reimbursed the amount advanced. [L 1971, c 215, §4; am L 1975, c 184, §2(17);
am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c 104, §2; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2005,
c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16; am L 2015, c 237, §38]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next